Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0693, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Renters. (a) A taxpayer whose rent constituting property taxes exceeds the percentage of the household income stated below must pay an amount equal to the percent of income shown for the appropriate household income level along with the percent paid by claimant of the remaining amount of rent constituting property taxes. The credit under subdivision 2 equals the amount of rent constituting property taxes that remain, up to the maximum credit amount shown below. Household Income Percent of Income Percent paid by claimant Maximum Credit deleted text begin $0 to 6,479 deleted text end new text begin $0 to 6,669 new text end 1.0 percent 5 percent $ deleted text begin 2,640 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 6,480 to 8,609 deleted text end new text begin 6,670 to 8,859 new text end 1.0 percent 10 percent $ deleted text begin 2,640 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 8,610 to 10,759 deleted text end new text begin 8,860 to 11,069 new text end 1.1 percent 10 percent $ deleted text begin 2,570 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 10,760 to 15,089 deleted text end new text begin 11,070 to 15,529 new text end 1.2 percent 10 percent $ deleted text begin 2,510 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 15,090 to 19,399 deleted text end new text begin 15,530 to 19,959 new text end 1.3 percent 15 percent $ deleted text begin 2,430 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 19,400 to 21,539 deleted text end new text begin 19,960 to 22,159 new text end 1.4 percent 15 percent $ deleted text begin 2,370 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 21,540 to 23,679 deleted text end new text begin 22,160 to 24,359 new text end 1.4 percent 20 percent $ deleted text begin 2,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 23,680 to 28,009 deleted text end new text begin 24,360 to 28,819 new text end 1.5 percent 20 percent $ deleted text begin 2,240 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 28,010 to 30,159 deleted text end new text begin 28,820 to 31,029 new text end 1.6 percent 20 percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 30,160 to 32,309 deleted text end new text begin 31,030 to 33,239 new text end 1.7 percent 25 percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 32,310 to 36,629 deleted text end new text begin 33,240 to 37,689 new text end 1.8 percent 25 percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 36,630 to 38,769 deleted text end new text begin 37,690 to 39,889 new text end 1.9 percent 30 percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 38,770 to 45,229 deleted text end new text begin 39,890 to 46,539 new text end 2.0 percent 30 percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 45,230 to 51,689 deleted text end new text begin 46,540 to 53,179 new text end 2.0 percent 35 percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end deleted text begin 51,690 to 60,319 deleted text end new text begin 53,180 to 62,059 new text end 2.0 percent 40 percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 2,830 new text end deleted text begin 60,320 to 62,459 deleted text end new text begin 62,060 to 64,259 new text end 2.0 percent 45 percent $ deleted text begin 1,980 deleted text end new text begin 2,830 new text end deleted text begin 62,460 to 64,619 deleted text end new text begin 64,260 to 66,479 new text end 2.0 percent 45 percent $ deleted text begin 1,780 deleted text end new text begin 2,830 new text end deleted text begin 64,620 to 66,789 deleted text end new text begin 66,480 to 68,719 new text end 2.0 percent 45 percent $ deleted text begin 1,510 deleted text end new text begin 2,830 new text end deleted text begin 66,790 to 68,929 deleted text end new text begin 68,720 to 70,919 new text end 2.0 percent 50 percent $ deleted text begin 1,320 deleted text end new text begin 2,830 new text end deleted text begin 68,930 to 71,089 deleted text end new text begin 70,920 to 73,139 new text end 2.0 percent 50 percent $ deleted text begin 1,190 deleted text end new text begin 2,830 new text end deleted text begin 71,090 to 73,239 deleted text end new text begin 73,140 to 75,349 new text end 2.0 percent 50 percent $ deleted text begin 660 deleted text end new text begin 2,830 new text end deleted text begin 73,240 to 75,389 deleted text end new text begin 75,350 to 77,569 new text end 2.0 percent 50 percent $ deleted text begin 260 deleted text end new text begin 2,830 new text end new text begin 77,570 to 88,259 new text end new text begin 2.0 percent new text end new text begin 50 percent new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,480 new text end new text begin 88,260 to 99,299 new text end new text begin 2.1 percent new text end new text begin 50 percent new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 2,050 new text end new text begin 99,300 to 110,339 new text end new text begin 2.2 percent new text end new text begin 50 percent new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,840 new text end new text begin 110,340 to 121,369 new text end new text begin 2.3 percent new text end new text begin 50 percent new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,610 new text end new text begin 121,370 to 127,999 new text end new text begin 2.4 percent new text end new text begin 50 percent new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,350 new text end new text begin 128,000 to 132,439 new text end new text begin 2.5 percent new text end new text begin 50 percent new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,130 new text end new text begin 132,440 to 137,789 new text end new text begin 2.5 percent new text end new text begin 50 percent new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 920 new text end new text begin 137,790 to 143,139 new text end new text begin 2.5 percent new text end new text begin 50 percent new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 690 new text end The credit is the amount calculated under this subdivision. No credit is allowed if the taxpayer's household income is deleted text begin $75,389deleted text end new text begin $143,140new text end or more. (b) The commissioner must annually adjust the dollar amounts of the income thresholds and the maximum refunds in paragraph (a), as provided in section 270C.22. The statutory year is deleted text begin 2024deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end . (c) The commissioner shall construct and make available to taxpayers a comprehensive table showing the rent constituting property taxes to be paid and refund allowed at various levels of income and assessment. The table shall follow the schedule of income percentages, maximums, and other provisions specified in paragraph (a), except that the commissioner may graduate the transition between income brackets. All refunds shall be computed in accordance with tables prepared and issued by the commissioner. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end